Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2378
Local hospital district; security in lieu of bond authorized.

In lieu of a bond as provided in sections 77-2373 to 77-2377, any bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution making application to become a depository under sections 77-2369 to 77-2385 may give security as provided in the Public Funds Deposit Security Act to the secretary-treasurer. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1994, LB 1118, § 10;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 55;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 78.

Public Funds Deposit Security Act, see section 77-2386.